Utah statutes.
16-16-807.   Removal of director.
Unless the organic rules otherwise provide, the following rules apply:
(1)  Members may remove a director with or without cause.
(2)  A member or members holding at least 10% of the total voting power
entitled to be voted in the election of a director may demand removal of the
director by one or more signed petitions submitted to the officer of the
limited cooperative association charged with keeping its records.
(3)  Upon receipt of a petition for removal of a director, an officer of the
association or the board of directors shall:
(a)  call a special meeting of members to be held not later than 90 days after
receipt of the petition by the association; and
(b)  mail or otherwise transmit or deliver in a record to the members entitled
to vote on the removal, and to the director to be removed, notice of the
meeting which complies with Section 16-16-508.
(4)  A director is removed if the votes in favor of removal are equal to or
greater than the votes required to elect the director.
